District of Columbia statutes.
29-1113

Procedural requirements for member meetings.

(a)

Unless an unincorporated nonprofit association’s governing principles provide otherwise:

(1)

Approval of a matter by the members shall require an affirmative majority of the votes cast at a meeting of members; and

(2)

Each member shall be entitled to one vote on each matter that is submitted for approval by members.

(b)

The governing principles may provide for the:

(1)

Calling, location, and timing of member meetings;

(2)

Notice and quorum requirements for member meetings;

(3)

Conduct of member meetings;

(4)

Taking of action by the members by consent without a meeting or casting ballots; and

(5)

Participation by members in a member meeting by telephone or other means of electronic communication.

(c)

If the governing principles do not provide for a matter described in subsection (b) of this section, customary usages and principles of parliamentary law and procedure apply.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(k)(4), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “Procedural requirements for member meetings” for “Member Meeting, voting and notice requirements” in the section heading; substituted “the members” for “members” in (a)(1); rewrote (b); and added (c).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 17 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.